Massachusetts, session 194th, S802.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 33 the following section:-
Section 34. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following term shall have the
following meaning:
“Preventive behavioral health services”, short-term interventions in supportive group,
individual, or family settings that cultivate coping skills and strategies for symptoms of
depression, anxiety, and other social and emotional concerns, which may prevent the
development of behavioral health conditions for members who are under 21 years old who have
a positive behavioral health screening, or, in the case of an infant, a caregiver with a positive
post-partum depression screening, even if the individual does not meet criteria for behavioral
health diagnosis.
of 7

(b)(1) Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of the
commonwealth under the group insurance commission shall provide coverage for no fewer than
six sessions of preventive behavioral health services provided by a qualified licensed behavioral
health clinician, or a non-licensed clinician or trainee under supervision, without requiring prior
authorization. Coverage shall include individual, family and group sessions when delivered by a
behavioral health clinician practicing in an integrated pediatric primary care setting and group
sessions when delivered in community-based outpatient and school settings. Preventive
behavioral health services shall be covered with no patient cost-sharing; provided, however, that
cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue
Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this
service.
(2) The commission and its contracted carriers shall accept an alternative diagnosis code,
including a Social Determinants of Health Z-code, as the primary diagnosis from eligible
providers submitting claims for preventive behavioral health services.
SECTION 2. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47UU the following section:-
Section 47VV. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following term shall have the
following meaning:
“Preventive behavioral health services”, short-term interventions in supportive group,
individual, or family settings that cultivate coping skills and strategies for symptoms of
depression, anxiety, and other social and emotional concerns, which may prevent the
development of behavioral health conditions for members who are under 21 years old who have
of 7

a positive behavioral health screening, or, in the case of an infant, a caregiver with a positive
post-partum depression screening, even if the individual does not meet criteria for behavioral
health diagnosis.
(b)(1) A policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, delivered or
renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for no fewer than six sessions of
preventive behavioral health services provided by a qualified licensed behavioral health
clinician, or a non-licensed clinician or trainee under supervision, without requiring prior
authorization. Coverage shall include individual, family and group sessions when delivered by a
behavioral health clinician practicing in an integrated pediatric primary care setting and group
sessions when delivered in community-based outpatient and school settings. Preventive
behavioral health services shall be covered with no patient cost-sharing; provided, however, that
cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue
Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this
service.
(2) Payers covered under this section shall accept an alternative diagnosis code, including
a Social Determinants of Health Z-code, as the primary diagnosis from eligible providers
submitting claims for preventive behavioral health services.
SECTION 3. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8VV the following section:-
Section 8WW. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following term shall have the
following meaning:
of 7

“Preventive behavioral health services”, short-term interventions in supportive group,
individual, or family settings that cultivate coping skills and strategies for symptoms of
depression, anxiety, and other social and emotional concerns, which may prevent the
development of behavioral health conditions for members who are under 21 years old who have
a positive behavioral health screening, or, in the case of an infant, a caregiver with a positive
post-partum depression screening, even if the individual does not meet criteria for behavioral
health diagnosis.
(b)(1) Any contract between a subscriber and a corporation subject to this chapter,
pursuant to an individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed
within or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for no fewer than six sessions of
preventive behavioral health services provided by a qualified licensed behavioral health
clinician, or a non-licensed clinician or trainee under supervision, without requiring prior
authorization. Coverage shall include individual, family and group sessions when delivered by a
behavioral health clinician practicing in an integrated pediatric primary care setting and group
sessions when delivered in community-based outpatient and school settings. Preventive
behavioral health services shall be covered with no patient cost-sharing; provided, however, that
cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue
Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this
service.
(2) Payers covered under this section shall accept an alternative diagnosis code, including
a Social Determinants of Health Z-code, as the primary diagnosis from eligible providers
submitting claims for preventive behavioral health services.
of 7

SECTION 4. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4VV the following section:-
Section 4WW. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following term shall have the
following meaning:
“Preventive behavioral health services”, short-term interventions in supportive group,
individual, or family settings that cultivate coping skills and strategies for symptoms of
depression, anxiety, and other social and emotional concerns, which may prevent the
development of behavioral health conditions for members who are under 21 years old who have
a positive behavioral health screening, or, in the case of an infant, a caregiver with a positive
post-partum depression screening, even if the individual does not meet criteria for behavioral
health diagnosis.
(b)(1) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement that is delivered, issued or renewed within or without the commonwealth shall
provide coverage for no fewer than six sessions of preventive behavioral health services
provided by a qualified licensed behavioral health clinician, or a non-licensed clinician or trainee
under supervision, without requiring prior authorization. Coverage shall include individual,
family and group sessions when delivered by a behavioral health clinician practicing in an
integrated pediatric primary care setting and group sessions when delivered in community-based
outpatient and school settings. Preventive behavioral health services shall be covered with no
patient cost-sharing; provided, however, that cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan
is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a
result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this service.
of 7

(2) Payers covered under this section shall accept an alternative diagnosis code, including
100 a Social Determinants of Health Z-code, as the primary diagnosis from eligible providers
101 submitting claims for preventive behavioral health services.
102 SECTION 5. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
103 section 4NN the following section:-
104 Section 4OO. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following term shall have the
105 following meaning:
106 “Preventive behavioral health services”, short-term interventions in supportive group,
107 individual, or family settings that cultivate coping skills and strategies for symptoms of
108 depression, anxiety, and other social and emotional concerns, which may prevent the
109 development of behavioral health conditions for members who are under 21 years old who have
110 a positive behavioral health screening, or, in the case of an infant, a caregiver with a positive
111 post-partum depression screening, even if the individual does not meet criteria for behavioral
112 health diagnosis.
113 (b)(1) Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed
114 within or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for no fewer than six sessions of
115 preventive behavioral health services provided by a qualified licensed behavioral health
116 clinician, or a non-licensed clinician or trainee under supervision, without requiring prior
117 authorization. Coverage shall include individual, family and group sessions when delivered by a
118 behavioral health clinician practicing in an integrated pediatric primary care setting and group
119 sessions when delivered in community-based outpatient and school settings. Preventive
120 behavioral health services shall be covered with no patient cost-sharing; provided, however, that
of 7

121 cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue
122 Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this
123 service.
124 (2) Payers covered under this section shall accept an alternative diagnosis code, including
125 a Social Determinants of Health Z-code, as the primary diagnosis from eligible providers
126 submitting claims for preventive behavioral health services.
127 SECTION 6. The division of insurance, in consultation with the office of Medicaid, shall
128 develop guidance to implement coverage of preventive behavioral health services.
of 7